Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska50-115
Assistant clerk; duties.

The assistant clerk shall be under the control and direction of the Clerk of the Legislature, and shall assist him in the proper discharge of his duties, and shall do and perform such other service as may be directed by the Legislature or by the Executive Board of the Legislative Council.

Laws 1867, § 4, p. 85;

R.S.1913, § 3755;

C.S.1922, § 3148;

C.S.1929, § 50-114;

Laws 1941, c. 101, § 1, p. 418;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 50-114;

R.S.1943, § 50-115;

Laws 1967, c. 328, § 9, p. 871.